Nevada, session 83, SB56.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 484C of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The Nevada Highway Patrol shall establish a format for
use by each law enforcement agency in this State to electronically
submit to the Office of Traffic Safety of the Department of Public
Safety information concerning violations of NRS 484C.110,
484C.120, 484C.130 and 484C.430.
2. To the extent that resources are available, each law
enforcement agency in this State shall submit electronically to the
Office of Traffic Safety of the Department of Public Safety, in the
format established pursuant to subsection 1, any information
requested by the Office of Traffic Safety concerning violations of
NRS 484C.110, 484C.120, 484C.130 and 484C.430.
Sec. 2. NRS 484C.110 is hereby amended to read as follows:
484C.110 1. It is unlawful for any person who:
(a) Is under the influence of intoxicating liquor;
(b) Has a concentration of alcohol of 0.08 or more in his or her
blood or breath; or
(c) Is found by measurement within [2] 3 hours after driving or
being in actual physical control of a vehicle to have a concentration
of alcohol of 0.08 or more in his or her blood or breath,
 to drive or be in actual physical control of a vehicle on a highway
or on premises to which the public has access.
2. It is unlawful for any person who:
(a) Is under the influence of a controlled substance;
(b) Is under the combined influence of intoxicating liquor and a
controlled substance; or
(c) Inhales, ingests, applies or otherwise uses any chemical,
poison or organic solvent, or any compound or combination of any
of these, to a degree which renders the person incapable of safely
driving or exercising actual physical control of a vehicle,
 to drive or be in actual physical control of a vehicle on a highway
or on premises to which the public has access. The fact that any
-
*SB56*

– 3 –
person charged with a violation of this subsection is or has been
entitled to use that drug under the laws of this State is not a defense
against any charge of violating this subsection.
3. It is unlawful for any person to drive or be in actual physical
control of a vehicle on a highway or on premises to which the public
has access with an amount of any of the following prohibited
substances in his or her blood or urine that is equal to or greater
than:

Urine Blood
Nanograms Nanograms
Prohibited substance per milliliter per milliliter

(a) Amphetamine 500 100
(b) Cocaine 150 50
(c) Cocaine metabolite 150 50
(d) Heroin 2,000 50
(e) Heroin metabolite:
(1) Morphine 2,000 50
(2) 6-monoacetyl morphine 10 10
(f) Lysergic acid diethylamide 25 10
(g) Methamphetamine 500 100
(h) Phencyclidine 25 10

4. For any violation that is punishable pursuant to paragraph
(c) of subsection 1 of NRS 484C.400, it is unlawful for any person
to drive or be in actual physical control of a vehicle on a highway or
on premises to which the public has access with an amount of any of
the following prohibited substances in his or her blood that is equal
to or greater than:

Blood
Nanograms
Prohibited substance per milliliter

(a) Marijuana (delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol) 2
(b) Marijuana metabolite (11-OH-tetrahydrocannabinol) 5

5. If consumption is proven by a preponderance of the
evidence, it is an affirmative defense under paragraph (c) of
subsection 1 that the defendant consumed a sufficient quantity of
alcohol after driving or being in actual physical control of the
vehicle, and before his or her blood or breath was tested, to cause
the defendant to have a concentration of alcohol of 0.08 or more in
his or her blood or breath. A defendant who intends to offer this
-
*SB56*

– 4 –
defense at a trial or preliminary hearing must, not less than 14 days
before the trial or hearing or at such other time as the court may
direct, file and serve on the prosecuting attorney a written notice of
that intent.
6. A person who violates any provision of this section may be
subject to any additional penalty set forth in NRS 484B.130 or
484B.135.
Sec. 3. NRS 484C.120 is hereby amended to read as follows:
484C.120 1. It is unlawful for any person who:
(a) Is under the influence of intoxicating liquor;
(b) Has a concentration of alcohol of 0.04 or more but less than
0.08 in his or her blood or breath; or
(c) Is found by measurement within [2] 3 hours after driving or
being in actual physical control of a commercial motor vehicle to
have a concentration of alcohol of 0.04 or more but less than 0.08 in
his or her blood or breath,
 to drive or be in actual physical control of a commercial motor
vehicle on a highway or on premises to which the public has access.
2. It is unlawful for any person who:
(a) Is under the influence of a controlled substance;
(b) Is under the combined influence of intoxicating liquor and a
controlled substance; or
(c) Inhales, ingests, applies or otherwise uses any chemical,
poison or organic solvent, or any compound or combination of any
of these, to a degree which renders the person incapable of safely
driving or exercising actual physical control of a commercial motor
vehicle,
 to drive or be in actual physical control of a commercial motor
vehicle on a highway or on premises to which the public has access.
The fact that any person charged with a violation of this subsection
is or has been entitled to use that drug under the laws of this State is
not a defense against any charge of violating this subsection.
3. It is unlawful for any person to drive or be in actual physical
control of a commercial motor vehicle on a highway or on premises
to which the public has access with any prohibited substance in his
or her blood or urine. As used in this subsection, “prohibited
substance” means any substance described in 21 C.F.R. § 1308.11.
4. If consumption is proven by a preponderance of the
evidence, it is an affirmative defense under paragraph (c) of
subsection 1 that the defendant consumed a sufficient quantity of
alcohol after driving or being in actual physical control of the
commercial motor vehicle, and before his or her blood or breath was
tested, to cause the defendant to have a concentration of alcohol of
0.04 or more in his or her blood or breath. A defendant who intends
to offer this defense at a trial or preliminary hearing must, not less
-
*SB56*

– 5 –
than 14 days before the trial or hearing or at such other time as the
court may direct, file and serve on the prosecuting attorney a written
notice of that intent.
5. A person who violates any provision of this section may be
subject to any additional penalty set forth in NRS 483.939,
484B.130 or 484B.135.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Commercial motor vehicle” means a motor vehicle or
combination of motor vehicles used in commerce to transport
passengers or property if the motor vehicle:
(1) Has a gross combination weight rating of 26,001 or more
pounds which includes a towed unit with a gross vehicle weight
rating of more than 10,000 pounds;
(2) Has a gross vehicle weight rating of 26,001 or more
pounds;
(3) Is designed to transport 16 or more passengers, including
the driver; or
(4) Regardless of size, is used in the transportation of
materials which are considered to be hazardous for the purposes of
the federal Hazardous Materials Transportation Act, 49 U.S.C. §§
5101 et seq., and for which the display of identifying placards is
required pursuant to 49 C.F.R. Part 172, Subpart F.
(b) The phrase “concentration of alcohol of 0.04 or more but
less than 0.08 in his or her blood or breath” means 0.04 gram or
more but less than 0.08 gram of alcohol per 100 milliliters of the
blood of a person or per 210 liters of his or her breath.
Sec. 4. NRS 484C.130 is hereby amended to read as follows:
484C.130 1. A person commits vehicular homicide if the
person:
(a) Drives or is in actual physical control of a vehicle on or off
the highways of this State and:
(1) Is under the influence of intoxicating liquor;
(2) Has a concentration of alcohol of 0.08 or more in his or
her blood or breath;
(3) Is found by measurement within [2] 3 hours after driving
or being in actual physical control of a vehicle to have a
concentration of alcohol of 0.08 or more in his or her blood or
breath;
(4) Is under the influence of a controlled substance or is
under the combined influence of intoxicating liquor and a controlled
substance;
(5) Inhales, ingests, applies or otherwise uses any chemical,
poison or organic solvent, or any compound or combination of any
of these, to a degree which renders the person incapable of safely
driving or exercising actual physical control of a vehicle; or
-
*SB56*

– 6 –
(6) Has a prohibited substance in his or her blood or urine, as
applicable, in an amount that is equal to or greater than the amount
set forth in subsection 3 or 4 of NRS 484C.110;
(b) Proximately causes the death of another person while driving
or in actual physical control of a vehicle on or off the highways of
this State; and
(c) Has previously been convicted of at least three offenses.
2. If consumption is proven by a preponderance of the
evidence, it is an affirmative defense under subparagraph (3) of
paragraph (a) of subsection 1 that the defendant consumed a
sufficient quantity of alcohol after driving or being in actual
physical control of the vehicle, and before his or her blood or breath
was tested, to cause the defendant to have a concentration of alcohol
of 0.08 or more in his or her blood or breath. A defendant who
intends to offer this defense at a trial or preliminary hearing must,
not less than 14 days before the trial or hearing or at such other time
as the court may direct, file and serve on the prosecuting attorney a
written notice of that intent.
3. As used in this section, “offense” means:
(a) A violation of NRS 484C.110, 484C.120 or 484C.430;
(b) A homicide resulting from driving or being in actual
physical control of a vehicle while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or a controlled substance or resulting from any
other conduct prohibited by this section or NRS 484C.110 or
484C.430; or
(c) A violation of a law of any other jurisdiction that prohibits
the same or similar conduct as set forth in paragraph (a) or (b).
Sec. 5. NRS 484C.430 is hereby amended to read as follows:
484C.430 1. Unless a greater penalty is provided pursuant to
NRS 484C.440, a person who:
(a) Is under the influence of intoxicating liquor;
(b) Has a concentration of alcohol of 0.08 or more in his or her
blood or breath;
(c) Is found by measurement within [2] 3 hours after driving or
being in actual physical control of a vehicle to have a concentration
of alcohol of 0.08 or more in his or her blood or breath;
(d) Is under the influence of a controlled substance or is under
the combined influence of intoxicating liquor and a controlled
substance;
(e) Inhales, ingests, applies or otherwise uses any chemical,
poison or organic solvent, or any compound or combination of any
of these, to a degree which renders the person incapable of safely
driving or exercising actual physical control of a vehicle; or
-
*SB56*

– 7 –
(f) Has a prohibited substance in his or her blood or urine, as
applicable, in an amount that is equal to or greater than the amount
set forth in subsection 3 or 4 of NRS 484C.110,
 and does any act or neglects any duty imposed by law while
driving or in actual physical control of any vehicle on or off the
highways of this State, if the act or neglect of duty proximately
causes the death of, or substantial bodily harm to, another person, is
guilty of a category B felony and shall be punished by imprisonment
in the state prison for a minimum term of not less than 2 years and a
maximum term of not more than 20 years and must be further
punished by a fine of not less than $2,000 nor more than $5,000. A
person so imprisoned must, insofar as practicable, be segregated
from offenders whose crimes were violent and, insofar as
practicable, be assigned to an institution or facility of minimum
security.
2. A prosecuting attorney shall not dismiss a charge of
violating the provisions of subsection 1 in exchange for a plea of
guilty, guilty but mentally ill or nolo contendere to a lesser charge or
for any other reason unless the attorney knows or it is obvious that
the charge is not supported by probable cause or cannot be proved at
the time of trial. A sentence imposed pursuant to subsection 1 may
not be suspended nor may probation be granted.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, if
consumption is proven by a preponderance of the evidence, it is an
affirmative defense under paragraph (c) of subsection 1 that the
defendant consumed a sufficient quantity of alcohol after driving or
being in actual physical control of the vehicle, and before his or her
blood or breath was tested, to cause the defendant to have a
concentration of alcohol of 0.08 or more in his or her blood or
breath. A defendant who intends to offer this defense at a trial or
preliminary hearing must, not less than 14 days before the trial
or hearing or at such other time as the court may direct, file and
serve on the prosecuting attorney a written notice of that intent.
4. If the defendant is also charged with violating the provisions
of NRS 484E.010, 484E.020 or 484E.030, the defendant may not
offer the affirmative defense set forth in subsection 3.
5. If the defendant was transporting a person who is less than
15 years of age in the motor vehicle at the time of the violation, the
court shall consider that fact as an aggravating factor in determining
the sentence of the defendant.
Sec. 6. NRS 488.410 is hereby amended to read as follows:
488.410 1. It is unlawful for any person who:
(a) Is under the influence of intoxicating liquor;
(b) Has a concentration of alcohol of 0.08 or more in his or her
blood or breath; or
-
*SB56*

– 8 –
(c) Is found by measurement within [2] 3 hours after operating
or being in actual physical control of a power-driven vessel or
sailing vessel under way to have a concentration of alcohol of 0.08
or more in his or her blood or breath,
 to operate or be in actual physical control of a power-driven
vessel or sailing vessel under way on the waters of this State.
2. It is unlawful for any person who:
(a) Is under the influence of a controlled substance;
(b) Is under the combined influence of intoxicating liquor and a
controlled substance; or
(c) Inhales, ingests, applies or otherwise uses any chemical,
poison or organic solvent, or any compound or combination of any
of these, to a degree which renders the person incapable of safely
operating or exercising actual physical control of a power-driven
vessel or sailing vessel under way,
 to operate or be in actual physical control of a power-driven
vessel or sailing vessel under way on the waters of this State.
3. It is unlawful for any person to operate or be in actual
physical control of a power-driven vessel or sailing vessel under
way on the waters of this State with an amount of any of the
following prohibited substances in his or her blood or urine that is
equal to or greater than:

Urine Blood
Nanograms per Nanograms per
Prohibited substance milliliter milliliter

(a) Amphetamine 500 100
(b) Cocaine 150 50
(c) Cocaine metabolite 150 50
(d) Heroin 2,000 50
(e) Heroin metabolite:
(1) Morphine 2,000 50
(2) 6-monoacetyl morphine 10 10
(f) Lysergic acid diethylamide 25 10
(g) Methamphetamine 500 100
(h) Phencyclidine 25 10

4. For any violation that is punishable pursuant to NRS
488.427, it is unlawful for any person to operate or be in actual
physical control of a power-driven vessel or sailing vessel under
way on the waters of this State with an amount of any of the
following prohibited substances in his or her blood that is equal to
or greater than:
-
*SB56*

– 9 –
Blood
Nanograms per
Prohibited substance milliliter

(a) Marijuana (delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol) 2
(b) Marijuana metabolite (11-OH-tetrahydrocannabinol) 5

5. If consumption is proven by a preponderance of the
evidence, it is an affirmative defense under paragraph (c) of
subsection 1 that the defendant consumed a sufficient quantity of
alcohol after operating or being in actual physical control of the
power-driven vessel or sailing vessel, as applicable, under way and
before his or her blood was tested, to cause the defendant to have a
concentration of 0.08 or more of alcohol in his or her blood or
breath. A defendant who intends to offer this defense at a trial or
preliminary hearing must, not less than 14 days before the trial
or hearing or at such other time as the court may direct, file and
serve on the prosecuting attorney a written notice of that intent.
6. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 488.427, a person who
violates the provisions of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.
Sec. 7. NRS 488.420 is hereby amended to read as follows:
488.420 1. Unless a greater penalty is provided pursuant to
NRS 488.425, a person who:
(a) Is under the influence of intoxicating liquor;
(b) Has a concentration of alcohol of 0.08 or more in his or her
blood or breath;
(c) Is found by measurement within [2] 3 hours after operating
or being in actual physical control of a power-driven vessel or
sailing vessel under way to have a concentration of alcohol of 0.08
or more in his or her blood or breath;
(d) Is under the influence of a controlled substance or is under
the combined influence of intoxicating liquor and a controlled
substance;
(e) Inhales, ingests, applies or otherwise uses any chemical,
poison or organic solvent, or any compound or combination of any
of these, to a degree which renders the person incapable of safely
operating or being in actual physical control of a power-driven
vessel or sailing vessel under way; or
(f) Has a prohibited substance in his or her blood or urine, as
applicable, in an amount that is equal to or greater than the amount
set forth in subsection 3 or 4 of NRS 488.410,
 and does any act or neglects any duty imposed by law while
operating or being in actual physical control of any power-driven
vessel or sailing vessel under way, if the act or neglect of duty
proximately causes the death of, or substantial bodily harm to,
-
*SB56*

– 10 –
another person, is guilty of a category B felony and shall be
punished by imprisonment in the state prison for a minimum term of
not less than 2 years and a maximum term of not more than 20 years
and shall be further punished by a fine of not less than $2,000 nor
more than $5,000. A person so imprisoned must, insofar as
practicable, be segregated from offenders whose crimes were violent
and, insofar as practicable, be assigned to an institution or facility of
minimum security.
2. A prosecuting attorney shall not dismiss a charge of
violating the provisions of subsection 1 in exchange for a plea of
guilty, guilty but mentally ill or nolo contendere to a lesser charge or
for any other reason unless the prosecuting attorney knows or it is
obvious that the charge is not supported by probable cause or cannot
be proved at the time of trial. A sentence imposed pursuant to
subsection 1 must not be suspended, and probation must not be
granted.
3. If consumption is proven by a preponderance of the
evidence, it is an affirmative defense under paragraph (c) of
subsection 1 that the defendant consumed a sufficient quantity of
alcohol after operating or being in actual physical control of the
power-driven vessel or sailing vessel, as applicable, under way and
before his or her blood was tested, to cause the defendant to have a
concentration of alcohol of 0.08 or more in his or her blood or
breath. A defendant who intends to offer this defense at a trial or
preliminary hearing must, not less than 14 days before the trial
or hearing or at such other time as the court may direct, file and
serve on the prosecuting attorney a written notice of that intent.
4. If a person less than 15 years of age was in the vessel at the
time of the defendant’s violation, the court shall consider that fact as
an aggravating factor in determining the sentence of the defendant.
Sec. 8. NRS 488.425 is hereby amended to read as follows:
488.425 1. A person commits homicide by vessel if the
person:
(a) Operates or is in actual physical control of a power-driven
vessel or sailing vessel under way on the waters of this State and:
(1) Is under the influence of intoxicating liquor;
(2) Has a concentration of alcohol of 0.08 or more in his or
her blood or breath;
(3) Is found by measurement within [2] 3 hours after
operating or being in actual physical control of a power-driven
vessel or sailing vessel under way to have a concentration of alcohol
of 0.08 or more in his or her blood or breath;
(4) Is under the influence of a controlled substance or is
under the combined influence of intoxicating liquor and a controlled
substance;
-
*SB56*

– 11 –
(5) Inhales, ingests, applies or otherwise uses any chemical,
poison or organic solvent, or any compound or combination of any
of these, to a degree which renders the person incapable of safely
operating or exercising actual physical control of a power-driven
vessel or sailing vessel under way; or
(6) Has a prohibited substance in his or her blood or urine, as
applicable, in an amount that is equal to or greater than the amount
set forth in subsection 3 or 4 of NRS 488.410;
(b) Proximately causes the death of another person while
operating or in actual physical control of a power-driven vessel or
sailing vessel under way; and
(c) Has previously been convicted of at least three offenses.
2. A person who commits homicide by vessel is guilty of a
category A felony and shall be punished by imprisonment in the
state prison:
(a) For life with the possibility of parole, with eligibility for
parole beginning when a minimum of 10 years has been served; or
(b) For a definite term of 25 years, with eligibility for parole
beginning when a minimum of 10 years has been served.
3. A person imprisoned pursuant to subsection 2 must, insofar
as practicable, be segregated from offenders whose crimes were
violent and, insofar as practicable, be assigned to an institution or
facility of minimum security.
4. A prosecuting attorney shall not dismiss a charge of
homicide by vessel in exchange for a plea of guilty, guilty but
mentally ill or nolo contendere to a lesser charge or for any other
reason unless the prosecuting attorney knows or it is obvious that
the charge is not supported by probable cause or cannot be proved at
the time of trial. A sentence imposed pursuant to subsection 2 may
not be suspended nor may probation be granted.
5. If consumption is proven by a preponderance of the
evidence, it is an affirmative defense under subparagraph (3) of
paragraph (a) of subsection 1 that the defendant consumed a
sufficient quantity of alcohol after operating or being in actual
physical control of the power-driven vessel or sailing vessel, as
applicable, under way and before his or her blood or breath was
tested, to cause the defendant to have a concentration of alcohol of
0.08 or more in his or her blood or breath. A defendant who intends
to offer this defense at a trial or preliminary hearing must, not less
than 14 days before the trial or hearing or at such other time as the
court may direct, file and serve on the prosecuting attorney a written
notice of that intent.
6. If the defendant was transporting a person who is less than
15 years of age in the power-driven vessel or sailing vessel, as
applicable, under way at the time of the violation, the court shall
-
*SB56*

– 12 –
consider that fact as an aggravating factor in determining the
sentence of the defendant.
7. As used in this section, “offense” means:
(a) A violation of NRS 488.410 or 488.420;
(b) A homicide resulting from operating or being in actual
physical control of a power-driven vessel or sailing vessel under
way while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or a controlled
substance or resulting from any other conduct prohibited by this
section or NRS 488.410 or 488.420; or
(c) A violation of a law of any other jurisdiction that prohibits
the same or similar conduct as set forth in paragraph (a) or (b).
H
-
*SB56*